Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-703
Tax; levy on resources severed; rate.

The taxes levied by section 57-702 shall be levied upon the value of the resources severed, and shall be paid at the rate of three percent of the value of nonstripper oil and natural gas, except that oil produced from properties producing stripper oil shall be subject to a two percent severance tax. The value of oil and natural gas shall be computed immediately after such severance at the place where the same were severed.

Laws 1955, c. 219, § 3, p. 611;

Laws 1981, LB 257, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 228, § 3.